Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 16
ACCIDENTS AND ACCIDENT REPORTS

Editor's note:

Section 42-4-103 (2)(b) provides that the provisions of this part 16 apply to the operation of vehicles and the movement of pedestrians upon streets and highways and elsewhere throughout the state.

Cross references:

For penalties for class 1 and class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

42-4-1601. Accidents involving death or personal injuries - duties.

The driver of any vehicle directly involved in an accident resulting in injury to, serious bodily injury to, or death of any person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close to the scene as possible or shall immediately return to the scene of the accident. The driver shall then remain at the scene of the accident until the driver has fulfilled the requirements of section 42-4-1603 (1). Every such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

(1.5) It shall not be an offense under this section if a driver, after fulfilling the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and of section 42-4-1603 (1), leaves the scene of the accident for the purpose of reporting the accident in accordance with the provisions of sections 42-4-1603 (2) and 42-4-1606.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits:

A class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense if the accident resulted in injury to any person;

A class 4 felony if the accident resulted in serious bodily injury to any person;

A class 3 felony if the accident resulted in the death of any person.

The department shall revoke the driver's license of the person so convicted. A revocation pursuant to this subsection (3) runs concurrently with any suspension imposed pursuant to section 42-2-127.9, if imposed as a result of the same episode of driving.

As used in this section and sections 42-4-1402.5, 42-4-1603, and 42-4-1606:

"Injury" means physical pain, illness, or any impairment of physical or mental condition.

"Serious bodily injury" means injury that involves, either at the time of the actual injury or at a later time, a substantial risk of death, a substantial risk of serious permanent disfigurement, or a substantial risk of protracted loss or impairment of the function of any part or organ of the body, or breaks, fractures, or burns of the second or third degree.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2399, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1443, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(4)(b) amended, p. 709, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 606, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(c) amended, p. 850, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 12-1084), ch. 261, p. 1354, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1277), ch. 337, p. 1803, § 2, effective January 1, 2018.

L. 2019:

IP(4) amended, (SB 19-175), ch. 331, p. 3072, § 3, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1401 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1601 was relocated to § 42-4-1801.

42-4-1602. Accident involving damage - duty.

The driver of any vehicle directly involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a vehicle which is driven or attended by any person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close thereto as possible but shall immediately return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of such accident, except in the circumstances provided in subsection (2) of this section, until the driver has fulfilled the requirements of section 42-4-1603. Every such stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary. Any person who violates any provision of this subsection (1) commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

When an accident occurs on the traveled portion, median, or ramp of a divided highway and each vehicle involved can be safely driven, each driver shall move such driver's vehicle as soon as practicable off the traveled portion, median, or ramp to a frontage road, the nearest suitable cross street, or other suitable location to fulfill the requirements of section 42-4-1603.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2400, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1402 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1602 was relocated to § 42-4-1802.

42-4-1603. Duty to give notice, information, and aid.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to, serious bodily injury to, or death of any person or damage to any vehicle which is driven or attended by any person shall give the driver's name, the driver's address, and the registration number of the vehicle he or she is driving and shall upon request exhibit his or her driver's license to the person struck or the driver or occupant of or person attending any vehicle collided with and where practical shall render to any person injured in such accident reasonable assistance, including the carrying, or the making of arrangements for the carrying, of such person to a physician, surgeon, or hospital for medical or surgical treatment if it is apparent that such treatment is necessary or if the carrying is requested by the injured person.

In the event that none of the persons specified are in condition to receive the information to which they otherwise would be entitled under subsection (1) of this section and no police officer is present, the driver of any vehicle involved in such accident after fulfilling all other requirements of subsection (1) of this section, insofar as possible on the driver's part to be performed, shall immediately report such accident to the nearest office of a duly authorized police authority as required in section 42-4-1606 and submit thereto the information specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2400, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1403 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1603 was relocated to § 42-4-1803.

42-4-1604. Duty upon striking unattended vehicle or other property.

The driver of any vehicle which collides with or is involved in an accident with any vehicle or other property which is unattended resulting in any damage to such vehicle or other property shall immediately stop and either locate and notify the operator or owner of such vehicle or other property of such fact, the driver's name and address, and the registration number of the vehicle he or she is driving or attach securely in a conspicuous place in or on such vehicle or other property a written notice giving the driver's name and address and the registration number of the vehicle he or she is driving. The driver shall also make report of such accident when and as required in section 42-4-1606. Every stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary. This section shall not apply to the striking of highway fixtures or traffic control devices which shall be governed by the provisions of section 42-4-1605. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2401, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1404 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1604 was relocated to § 42-4-1804.

42-4-1605. Duty upon striking highway fixtures or traffic control devices.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to fixtures or traffic control devices upon or adjacent to a highway shall notify the road authority in charge of such property of that fact and of the driver's name and address and of the registration number of the vehicle he or she is driving and shall make report of such accident when and as required in section 42-4-1606. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2401, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1405 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1605 was relocated to § 42-4-1805.

42-4-1606. Duty to report accidents.

The driver of a vehicle involved in a traffic accident resulting in injury to, serious bodily injury to, or death of any person or any property damage shall, after fulfilling the requirements of sections 42-4-1602 and 42-4-1603 (1), give immediate notice of the location of such accident and such other information as is specified in section 42-4-1603 (2) to the nearest office of the duly authorized police authority and, if so directed by the police authority, shall immediately return to and remain at the scene of the accident until said police have arrived at the scene and completed their investigation thereat.

Repealed.

The department may require any driver of a vehicle involved in an accident of which report must be made as provided in this section to file supplemental reports whenever the original report is insufficient in the opinion of the department and may require witnesses of accidents to render reports to the department.

It is the duty of all law enforcement officers who receive notification of traffic accidents within their respective jurisdictions or who investigate such accidents either at the time of or at the scene of the accident or thereafter by interviewing participants or witnesses to submit reports of all such accidents to the department on the form provided, including insurance information received from any driver, within five days of the time they receive such information or complete their investigation. The law enforcement officer shall indicate in such report whether the inflatable restraint system in the vehicle, if any, inflated and deployed in the accident. For the purposes of this section, "inflatable restraint system" has the same meaning as set forth in 49 CFR sec. 507.208 S4.1.5.1 (b).
(4) (a) (I) It is the duty of all law enforcement officers who receive notification of traffic accidents within their respective jurisdictions or who investigate such accidents either at the time of or at the scene of the accident or thereafter by interviewing participants or witnesses to submit reports of all such accidents to the department on the form provided, including insurance information received from any driver, within five days of the time they receive such information or complete their investigation. The law enforcement officer shall indicate in such report whether the inflatable restraint system in the vehicle, if any, inflated and deployed in the accident. For the purposes of this section, "inflatable restraint system" has the same meaning as set forth in 49 CFR sec. 507.208 S4.1.5.1 (b).

Repealed.

The law enforcement officer shall not be required to complete an investigation or file an accident report:

In the case of a traffic accident involving a motor vehicle, if the law enforcement officer has a reasonable basis to believe that damage to the property of any one person does not exceed one thousand dollars and if the traffic accident does not involve injury to or death of any person; except that the officer shall complete an investigation and file a report if specifically requested to do so by one of the participants or if one of the participants cannot show proof of insurance; or

In the case of a traffic accident not involving a motor vehicle, if the traffic accident does not involve serious bodily injury to or death of any person.

The person in charge at any garage or repair shop to which is brought any motor vehicle which shows evidence of having been struck by any bullet shall report to the nearest office of the duly authorized police authority within twenty-four hours after such motor vehicle is received, giving the vehicle identification number, registration number, and, if known, the name and address of the owner and operator of such vehicle together with any other discernible information.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2401, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 1208, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4)(a)(I) amended, p. 798, § 6, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(2) and (4)(a)(II) repealed, p. 463, § 2, effective August 4.

42-4-1607. When driver unable to give notice or make written report.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle is physically incapable of giving an immediate notice of an accident as required in section 42-4-1606 (1) and there was another occupant in the vehicle at the time of the accident capable of doing so, such occupant shall give or cause to be given the notice not given by the driver.

Repealed.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2403, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2004:

(3) added, p. 606, § 2, effective July 1; (2) repealed, p. 463, § 3, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1407 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1607 was relocated to § 42-4-1807.

42-4-1608. Accident report forms.

The department shall prepare and upon request supply to police departments, coroners, sheriffs, and other suitable agencies or individuals forms for accident reports required under this article, which reports shall call for sufficiently detailed information to disclose, with reference to a traffic accident, the contributing circumstances, the conditions then existing, and the persons and vehicles involved.

Every required accident report shall be made on a form approved by the department, where such form is available.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2403, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1408 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1608 was relocated to § 42-4-1808.

42-4-1609. Coroners to report.

Every coroner or other official performing like functions shall on or before the tenth day of each month report in writing to the department the death of any person within such official's jurisdiction during the preceding calendar month as the result of an accident involving a motor vehicle and the circumstances of such accident.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2403, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1409 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1609 was relocated to § 42-4-1809.

42-4-1610. Reports by interested parties confidential.

All accident reports and supplemental reports required by law to be made by any driver, owner, or person involved in any accident shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the department; except that the department may disclose the identity of a person involved in an accident when such identity is not otherwise known or when such person denies his or her presence at such accident. Except as provided in section 42-7-504 (2), no such report shall be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident; except that the department shall furnish, upon demand of any person who has, or claims to have, made such a report or upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to the department solely to prove a compliance or failure to comply with the requirement that such a report be made to the department. This section shall not be construed to mean that reports of investigation or other reports made by sheriffs, police officers, coroners, or other peace officers shall be confidential, but the same shall be public records and shall be subject to the provisions of section 42-1-206.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2403, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1410 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1610 was relocated to § 42-4-1810.

42-4-1611. Tabulation and analysis of reports.

The department shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports and shall publish annually or at more frequent intervals statistical information based thereon as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents and in such a way that the information may be of value to the department of transportation in eliminating roadway hazards. The statistical information shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2403, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 31, § 7, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1411 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1611 was relocated to § 42-4-1811.

42-4-1612. Accidents in state highway work areas.

Repealed.

For purposes of this section, "state highway work area" includes any area where an employee of the department of transportation is working at the time a fatal accident occurs.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the department of transportation or the Colorado state patrol to specifically identify by name any individual killed, injured, or otherwise involved in an accident.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1014), ch. 24, p. 98, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2017:

(1) repealed, (SB 17-231), ch. 174, p. 633, § 2, effective August 9.